Washington statutes.
RCW 41.37.050

Reduction of retirement allowance upon reemployment or if covered by a plan under RCW 28B.10.400—Reinstatement of membership.

(1)(a) If a retiree enters employment in an eligible position with an employer as defined in this chapter sooner than one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for every eight hours worked during that month. This reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment with an employer for one full calendar month.

(b) If a retiree enters employment in an eligible position with an employer as defined in chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW sooner than one calendar month after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will be reduced by five and one-half percent for every eight hours worked during that month. This reduction will be applied each month until the retiree remains absent from employment with an employer for one full calendar month.

(c) The benefit reduction provided in (a) and (b) of this subsection will accrue for a maximum of one hundred sixty hours per month. Any benefit reduction over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible to receive in subsequent months.

(2)(a) A retiree who has satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section may work up to eight hundred sixty-seven hours per calendar year in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010, 41.35.010, or 41.40.010, or as a law enforcement officer or firefighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030, or in a position covered by annuity and retirement income plans offered by institutions of higher education pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400, without suspension of his or her benefit.

(b) Between April 14, 2023, and July 1, 2026, a retiree who has satisfied the break in employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section, and who enters service in a nonadministrative position as a licensed nurse for a state agency, shall continue to receive pension payments while engaged in such service, until the retiree has rendered service for more than 1,040 hours in a calendar year.

(3) If the retiree opts to reestablish membership under this chapter, he or she terminates his or her retirement status and becomes a member. Retirement benefits shall not accrue during the period of membership and the individual shall make contributions and receive membership credit. Such a member shall have the right to again retire if eligible in accordance with this chapter. However, if the right to retire is exercised to become effective before the member has rendered two uninterrupted years of service, the retirement formula and survivor options the member had at the time of the member's previous retirement shall be reinstated.

(4) The department shall collect and provide the state actuary with information relevant to the use of this section for the select committee on pension policy.

[ 2023 c 99 s 1; 2011 1st sp.s. c 47 s 17; 2005 c 327 s 6; 2004 c 242 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 99: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 14, 2023]." [ 2023 c 99 s 3.]

Intent—Effective dates—2011 1st sp.s. c 47: See notes following RCW 28B.10.400.

Effective date—2005 c 327 ss 4-7: See note following RCW 41.37.010.